Utah statutes.
76-5-402.1.   Rape of a child.

(1)  A person commits rape of a child when the person has sexual intercourse with a child who is under the age of 14.

(2)  Rape of a child is a first degree felony punishable by a term of imprisonment of:

(a)  except as provided in Subsection (2)(b), not less than 25 years and which may be for life; or

(b)  life without parole, if the trier of fact finds that:

(i)  during the course of the commission of the rape of a child, the defendant caused serious bodily injury to another; or

(ii)  at the time of the commission of the rape of a child the defendant was previously convicted of a grievous sexual offense.

(3)  Subsection (2)(b) does not apply if the defendant was younger than 18 years of age at the time of the offense.

(4)  Imprisonment under this section is mandatory in accordance with Section 76-3-406.



Amended by Chapter 81, 2013 General Session

